Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 3.2. Recycling Duties of State Agencies and State Universities.

§ 10.1-1425.6.
Recycling programs of state agencies.

It shall be the duty of each baccalaureate public institution of higher education in the Commonwealth and state agency of the Commonwealth, including the General Assembly, to establish programs for the use of recycled materials and for the collection, to the extent feasible, of all recyclable materials used or generated by such entities, including, at a minimum, used motor oil, glass, aluminum, office paper and corrugated paper. Such programs shall be in accordance with the programs and plans developed by the Department of Waste Management, which shall serve as the lead agency for the Commonwealth’s recycling efforts. The Department shall develop such programs and plans by July 1, 1991.

In fulfilling its duties under this section, each agency of the Commonwealth shall implement procedures for (i) the collection and storage of recyclable materials generated by such agency, (ii) the disposal of such materials to buyers, and (iii) the reduction of waste materials generated by such agency.

History.

1990, c. 616.

The number for this article, and the numbers for the sections contained therein, §§

10.1-1425.6

through

10.1-1425.9

,

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 1990 act having been Article 3.1, and

10.1-1425.1

through

10.1-1425.5

, respectively.

Cross references.

As to this section and the implementation by state agencies of purchase programs for recycled goods under the Virginia Public Procurement Act, see § 2.2-4323.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “baccalaureate public institution of higher education in the Commonwealth” was substituted for “state university” in subsection A to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

§ 10.1-1425.7.
Duty of the Department of Small Business and Supplier Diversity.

The Department of Small Business and Supplier Diversity shall assist the Department by encouraging and promoting the establishment of appropriate recycling industries in the Commonwealth.

History.

1990, c. 616; 1996, cc. 589, 599; 2013, c. 482.

Cross references.

As to this section and the implementation by state agencies of purchase programs for recycled goods under the Virginia Public Procurement Act, see § 2.2-4323.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 482, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “Small Business and Supplier Diversity” for “Business Assistance.”

§ 10.1-1425.8.
Department of Transportation; authority and duty.

The Department of Transportation is authorized to conduct recycling research projects, including the establishment of demonstration projects which use recycled products in highway construction and maintenance. Such projects may include by way of example and not by limitation the use of ground rubber from used tires or glass for road surfacing, resurfacing and sub-base materials, as well as the use of plastic or mixed plastic materials for ground or guard rail posts, right-of-way fence posts and sign supports.

The Department of Transportation shall periodically review and revise its bid procedures and specifications to encourage the use of products and materials with recycled content in its construction and maintenance programs.

The Commissioner of Highways may continue to provide for the collection of used motor oil and motor vehicle antifreeze from the general public at maintenance facilities in the County of Bath. The Commissioner of Highways may designate the source of funding for the collection and disposal of these materials.

History.

1990, c. 616; 1993, c. 801; 1994, c. 419; 1995, c. 109; 1996, c. 290.

Cross references.

As to this section and the implementation by state agencies of purchase programs for recycled goods under the Virginia Public Procurement Act, see § 2.2-4323.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 36 and 152, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Code Commission shall carry out such editorial changes to the Code of Virginia as may be required to reflect the provisions of this act changing the title ‘Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner’ to ‘Commissioner of Highways.”’ “Commissioner of Highways” was substituted for “Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner” in this section.

§ 10.1-1425.9.
Duties of the Department of Education.

With the assistance of the Department of Waste Management, the Department of Education shall develop by July 1, 1992, guidelines for public schools regarding (i) the use of recycled materials, (ii) the collection of recyclable materials, and (iii) the reduction of solid waste generated in such school’s offices, classrooms and cafeterias.

History.

1990, c. 616.